Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-928
Cities of first or second class or villages; included in improvement district.

Lots and lands within the confines of any village or city of the second or first class may be included within the boundaries of an improvement project as provided for in sections 31-907 to 31-918.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 28, p. 493;

Laws 1961, c. 138, § 11, p. 403.

Cities and villages, classification, see sections 16-101, 17-101, and 17-201.